Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.290

Reports by employers.

Every owner, operator, or manager of a factory, workshop, mill, mine, or other establishment where labor is employed, shall make to the department, upon blanks furnished by it, such reports and returns as the department may require, for the purpose of compiling such labor statistics as are authorized by this chapter, and the owner or business manager shall make such reports and returns within the time prescribed therefor by the director, and shall certify to the correctness thereof.

In the reports of the department no use shall be made of the names of individuals, firms, or corporations supplying the information called for by this section, such information being deemed confidential, and not for the purpose of disclosing personal affairs, and any officer, agent, or employee of the department violating this provision shall be fined a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for up to three hundred sixty-four days.

[ 2011 c 96 s 28; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.290. Prior: 1901 c 74 s 3; RRS s 7588.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.